Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 9. Automatic Dialing-Announcing Devices.

§ 77-3-451.
Definitions.

As used in this article, “automatic dialing-announcing device” means any automatic equipment which incorporates a storage capability of telephone numbers to be called or a random or sequential number generator capable of producing numbers to be called and the capability, working alone or in conjunction with other equipment, to disseminate a prerecorded message to the telephone number called.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 436, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 77-3-453.
Public Service Commission to regulate; application of article; hours of operation; use for purpose of inducing purchase of goods or services prohibited; exceptions.

The connection of automatic dialing-announcing devices to a telephone line is subject to this article and to the jurisdiction, control and regulation of the Public Service Commission.

No person shall operate an automatic dialing-announcing device except in accordance with this article. The use of such device by any person, either individually or acting as an officer, agent or employee of a person or corporation operating automatic dialing-announcing devices, is subject to this article.

No person shall operate an automatic dialing-announcing device to place a call which is received by a telephone in this state during the hours between 9 p.m. and 9 a.m. Central time zone.

No person shall operate an automatic dialing-announcing device to place a call which is received by a telephone in this state for the purpose of persuading, inducing or encouraging the person called to purchase any type of product or service.

This article does not apply to any automatic dialing-answering device which is not used to randomly or sequentially dial telephone numbers but which is used solely to transmit a message to an established business associate, customer or other person having an established relationship with the person using the automatic dialing-answering device to transmit the message, or to any call generated at the request of the recipient.

The Public Service Commission may determine any question of fact arising under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 436, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 77-3-455.
Requirements for placing calls using automatic dialing-announcing devices.

Automatic dialing-announcing devices may be used to place calls over telephone lines only pursuant to a prior agreement between the persons involved, by which the person called has agreed that he or she consents to receive such calls from the person calling, or as specified in subsection (2) of this section.

Whenever telephone calls are placed through the use of an automatic dialing-announcing device, such device shall be operated by a person who shall do all of the following:

State the nature of the call and the name, address and telephone number of the business or organization being represented, if any.

Inquire whether the person called consents to hear the prerecorded message of the person calling.

Disconnect the automatic dialing-announcing device from the telephone line upon the termination of the call by either the person calling or the person called.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 436, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 77-3-457.
Application to connect automatic dialing-announcing device; penalties.

No person shall connect any automatic dialing-announcing device to any telephone line without first making written application to the telephone corporation within whose service area telephone calls through the use of such device are proposed to be placed. In such application, the person shall provide information as to the type of automatic dialing-announcing device proposed to be connected, the time of day such telephone calls are proposed to be placed using such device, the anticipated number of calls proposed to be placed during the specified calling period, the average length of a completed call and such additional information as the corporation or the commission may require. Upon receiving such an application for service, the corporation shall review the furnished information and, if it appears that calling patterns would create a traffic overload condition or the service would be detrimental to the services of other customers of the corporation, it may deny the application or modify the application and grant the application as so modified.

Any person violating this article is guilty of a civil offense and is subject to either or both of the following penalties:

A fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for each violation, levied and enforced by the Public Service Commission, on complaint or on its own motion. For purposes of this article “violation” means each call placed by an automatic dialing-announcing device connected contrary to the provisions of this article.

Disconnection of telephone service to the automatic dialing-announcing device for a period of time which shall be specified by the Public Service Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 436, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 77-3-459.
Legislative intent; retroactive effect of article.

It is the intent of the Legislature that this article shall apply to any automatic dialing-announcing devices connected to any telephone line both prior and subsequent to July 1, 1989.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 436, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1989.